Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 4. Board of Public Utilities

§ 15-7-401.
Establishment; powers and duties generally.

Any city or town which owns and operates a municipal waterworks, a sanitary sewer system, a sewage disposal plant or an electric utility distribution system may establish a board of commissioners to be known as the board of public utilities. The board of public utilities shall manage, operate, maintain and control such plants and make all rules and regulations necessary for their safe, economical and efficient operation and management. The board may also improve, extend or enlarge the plants as provided in this article.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 442; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-442; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to power of municipal corporations relative to the acquisition of water rights, see art. 13, § 5, Wyo. Const.

As to construction and improvement of works for conservation and utilization of water, see art. 16, § 10, Wyo. Const.

For general state law relative to water, see title 41.

Validity. —

Section is not invalid for failure to give people opportunity to vote as to whether or not board of public utilities should be created. Stewart v. Cheyenne, 60 Wyo. 497, 154 P.2d 355,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1944).

Utility board may be elected or appointed. —

Legislature may constitutionally grant to municipal corporation right to elect or appoint board of public utilities. Stewart v. Cheyenne, 60 Wyo. 497, 154 P.2d 355,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1944).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Municipality's duty and liability with respect to excavations made by abutting owner to connect his property with service mains and street, 13 ALR2d 922.

Municipality's constructive notice with respect to excavation made by abutting owner who connects his property with service mains in street, 13 ALR2d 922.

§ 15-7-402.
Appointment, qualifications, terms and removal of members; vacancies.

The board of public utilities shall consist of five (5) members to be appointed by the mayor with the advice and consent of the governing body. Members appointed shall be persons of business experience, not less than thirty (30) years of age, citizens of the United States and for five (5) years immediately preceding their appointment residents of the city or town. One (1) member of the board shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years, two (2) for a term of four (4) years and two (2) for a term of six (6) years. Thereafter each member shall be appointed for a term of six (6) years. Any member of the board may be removed by the mayor with the concurrence of the governing body for cause other than politics or religion after public hearing. The mayor shall fill any vacancy by appointment for the unexpired term only.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 443; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-443; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-403.
Officers; meetings; records; salaries.

The board shall elect from their own number a president and a secretary and hold meetings at least once a month, and at the call of the president or three (3) members of the board. The board shall adopt its own rules of procedure and keep a record of its proceedings. All meetings, records and accounts of the board are public. Three (3) members constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The salaries of the members of the board shall be fixed by ordinance, but may not exceed six hundred dollars ($600.00) each per year.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 444; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-444; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision that all state, city, county, town and school officers (with certain exceptions) shall be paid fixed and definite salaries, and for duty of such officers to pay all fees collected into the proper treasury, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.

§ 15-7-404.
Specific powers and duties; vouchers; civil service or pension system.

The board of public utilities has exclusive control of all municipally owned waterworks, sanitary sewer systems and sewage disposal plants, or any of them, as specified by ordinance. The board is charged with producing and supplying the city or town and its inhabitants with water for domestic and industrial purposes, and for public use, and may sell and dispose of any surplus outside of the city or town. The board may also furnish surplus sanitary sewer facilities to persons outside of the city or town.

The board may:

Hire and discharge all employees and agents of these departments and fix their compensation;

Purchase all machinery, tools and other appliances and all materials and supplies necessary for the purposes of the departments;

In the name of the city or town take and hold by lease, purchase, gift, devise, bequest or otherwise such franchises and property, either within or without the city or town, as may be necessary or convenient for carrying out the purposes of the board, including office space and equipment for carrying on the business of these departments;

Establish all reasonable rules and regulations to protect the rights and property vested in the city or town and under control of the board;

Issue vouchers or warrants in payment of all claims and accounts incurred by the board for its departments. When the vouchers or warrants are approved by the board the city or town treasurer shall pay and charge them against the proper funds.

The board may:

Provide for either civil service status or pension system, or both, for its employees, which shall be under the supervision and subject to the order of the board;

Withhold two percent (2%) of the wages of its employees to be placed in a fund to be known as “utilities department pension fund”;

Set aside and place in the pension fund each month, an amount not to exceed three (3) times the total amount of two percent (2%) deducted each month from employees’ wages for pension purposes.

Disbursements from the pension fund shall be made in the same manner as other disbursements and payments made pursuant to this article.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 445; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-445; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-405.
Director of utilities; superintendent; office manager; utility attorney.

The board of public utilities may select and appoint and fix the salaries of the following persons, who serve at the board’s pleasure:

A director of utilities;

A superintendent;

An office manager; and

A utility attorney, who shall not be required to perform any service other than legal service.

Each appointee shall:

Be a competent person thoroughly qualified for his position by training and experience as the board requires;

Give a good and sufficient surety bond to the city or town in the sum fixed and approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of his duties. The cost of each bond shall be paid out of the revenue of these plants. If the board is operating more than one (1) plant the cost of the bond shall be paid pro rata out of the revenue of the plants;

Perform all duties as prescribed and required by the board.

The director of utilities, if one is appointed, has general supervision over all activities, property and employees of the board. The board may delegate its authority to the director of utilities to make appointments, including those of office manager and superintendent, and to hire, promote, transfer, demote and discharge employees of the departments. He shall fix their salaries with the consent of the board.

Under direction of the board and of the director of utilities, if one is appointed, the superintendent shall:

Manage and control the water plant and its distribution system, the sanitary sewer system including sewage disposal plant or plants and the electric utility distribution system;

Supervise and inspect all parts of the plants and see that they are maintained in good condition for use and that all employees attend to their respective duties;

Keep in good repair all machinery and other property; and

Advise the board and director of utilities, if one is appointed, as to the needs of the plants.

All employees, servants and agents of these plants, when appointed by the board, are under the immediate control and management of the director of utilities and the superintendent.

Under direction of the board and of the director of utilities, if one is appointed, the office manager shall keep a regular set of books for the water department, the sanitary sewer department and the electric utility distribution system showing in detail their business transactions. Immediately following the close of each month he shall make any reports to the board, the director of utilities and the governing body of the city or town, as they require, showing the transactions of the preceding month and the financial conditions of the departments. The reports shall include a correct account of all collections, appropriations, expenditures and approved claims entitled to payment. The board may appoint assistants to the office manager as it deems necessary.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 446; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-446; Laws 1969, ch. 190, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1989, ch. 47, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision that all state, city, county, town and school officers (with certain exceptions) shall be paid fixed and definite salaries, and for duty of such officers to pay all fees collected into the proper treasury, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.

Office manager's salary fixed by board. —

Office manager who is under control of board of public utilities is an employee and not an officer, and his salary need not be fixed by legislature. Stewart v. Cheyenne, 60 Wyo. 497, 154 P.2d 355,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1944).

§ 15-7-406.
Agents, servants and employees.

The board shall make all appointments and hire all agents, servants and employees of the departments, fix their compensation and determine their qualifications, considering only the relative capacity of applicants, their moral, physical and health qualifications and when appropriate, their qualifications for manual labor. All appointments shall be made on the basis of merit alone, and no appointment may be made on account of political services or affiliations. All agents, servants and employees shall hold their offices at the board’s pleasure.

The board may delegate the authority to hire, promote, transfer, demote and discharge its employees to a director of utilities, if one is appointed.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 448; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-448; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1989, ch. 47, § 1.

Cross references. —

For authority of board of public utilities to establish a civil service and pension system for its employees, see §

15-7-404

.

§ 15-7-407.
Consumer rates; depreciation.

The board shall fix the rates for water, sanitary sewer services and electric service furnished to customers, and any revision thereof is subject to the local governing body’s review, modification and approval. The rates shall secure an income sufficient to:

Pay the interest charges and principal payments on all bonds issued to pay the purchase price, construction cost, extensions and enlargements of the respective systems as they are due;

Pay all salaries and wages of the officers and employees;

Cover the cost of all materials and supplies used in the operation of the plants;

Cover all miscellaneous expenses;

Cover all usual extensions and enlargements, together with a reasonable allowance for emergency and unforeseen expenses; and

Provide and maintain a depreciation fund for each department.

The board shall account for the depreciation of the water plant and of the sanitary sewer system, including sewage disposal plant or plants, using rates of depreciation approved by the board and the local governing body. The depreciation fund shall be used only to pay for replacements and additions to the waterworks, sanitary sewer systems and sewage disposal plants. Replacements and additions shall be capitalized and the capital value added to the value of the systems to establish the value of the plants for depreciation purposes. The local governing body may by ordinance fix special rates for water, electric or sanitary sewer services furnished to the governing body of the city or town for public purposes, or to organized institutions of charity, or to any person who is eligible for assistance under W.S. 39-11-109(c)(ii) through (vii).

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 449; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-449; Laws 1971, ch. 50, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; ch. 43, § 1; 1991, ch. 43, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Discrimination between property within and that outside municipality or other governmental district as to public service or utility rates, 4 ALR2d 595.

Validity and construction of regulation by municipal corporation fixing sewer-use rates, 61 ALR3d 1236.

§ 15-7-408.
Use of surplus water or sewage funds.

The board of public utilities shall use any surplus funds arising from the sale of water or sewage services for the purchase and cancellation of any bonds issued to pay the purchase price of the water or sewer plants or the cost of their construction, extension and enlargement. The board shall not pay for any bonds any sum greater than par, plus a premium of not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the face value on all unearned interest coupons attached to any bond purchased, or pay more than the actual market price of the bonds at the time of purchasing them. Any surplus after the purchase of bonds shall be paid into the general fund of the city or town.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 450; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-450; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-409.
Meter deposit fund; investment; interest; repayment.

The board of public utilities of any city or town engaged in the business of supplying water or electricity to its inhabitants which requires deposits to be made on water meters or electric meters furnished its customers, shall place all monies received from the deposits in a separate fund. The fund may be invested in securities as provided by law for trust funds of cities or towns. Any interest or income earned by or accruing to the fund, not otherwise pledged for the payment of general obligations or revenue bonds, may annually be transferred and paid into the general fund of the city or town. Any person who has made or makes a deposit on a water meter or electric meter is entitled only to the repayment of the principal amount of his deposit.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 451; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-451; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-410.
Treasurer; duties; bond.

The treasurer of the city or town is ex officio treasurer of the board of public utilities. All funds and property in his hands belonging to these departments are subject to the board’s control, and he shall receive and receipt for the money collected by the employees of the board and pay out those funds when ordered by the board upon warrants signed by its president and countersigned by the office manager, certifying that the warrant is issued by the board’s authority. He shall also cooperate with the office manager and supply him with official information to permit the making of the monthly reports provided for in W.S.

15-7-405

, and any other information the board requires. As ex officio treasurer to the board, he shall give a surety bond in the sum approved by the board. The board shall pay the cost of the bond in the same manner as provided for other bonds in this article.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 452; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-452; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-411.
Duty of city clerk.

The clerk of the city or town shall furnish the board with copies of all ordinances, resolutions, agreements, contracts and other records the board requires.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 453; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-453; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-412.
Additional powers and duties.

In so far as applicable the board of public utilities shall exercise all other powers and duties under acts and part of acts relating to water plants and sanitary sewer systems, including sewage disposal plants, in cities and towns.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 454; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-454; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.